Maryland, session 2025, SB0473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
10–2101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Fund” means the Maryland Food and Agricultural Resiliency Mechanism
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0473*

SENATE BILL 473
Fund.
(c) “MD FARM” means the Maryland Food and Agricultural Resiliency
Mechanism Grant Program.
(D) “OPERATING FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND FOOD AND
AGRICULTURAL RESILIENCY OPERATING FUND.
(E) “QUALIFIED SUPPLIER” MEANS A BUSINESS ENTITY OR NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION THAT OPERATES A FARM OR COMMUNITY GARDEN IN THE STATE
THAT:
(1) OPERATES ON AT LEAST 100 ACRES;
(2) GROWS AT LEAST 1,000,000 POUNDS OF PRODUCE ANNUALLY;
AND
(3) DONATES AT LEAST 25% OF ITS ANNUAL HARVEST TO THE
STATE’S FOOD BANKS AND CHARITABLE EMERGENCY FOOD PROVIDERS AT NO COST.
10–2102.
(a) There is a Maryland Food and Agricultural Resiliency Mechanism Grant
Program.
(b) The purpose of MD FARM is to build food system resiliency by leveraging
Maryland agricultural products and services to support the State’s food banks [and],
charitable emergency food providers, AND QUALIFIED SUPPLIERS to alleviate food
insecurity.
10–2104.
(A) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND FOOD AND AGRICULTURAL RESILIENCY
OPERATING FUND IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE OPERATING FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS
TO QUALIFIED SUPPLIERS FOR OPERATIONAL COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH SUPPLYING
AGRICULTURAL FOOD PRODUCTS TO THE STATE’S FOOD BANKS AND CHARITABLE
EMERGENCY FOOD PROVIDERS.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE OPERATING FUND.
(C) (1) THE OPERATING FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS
NOT SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 473 3
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE OPERATING FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE OPERATING
FUND.
(D) THE OPERATING FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
OPERATING FUND; AND
(2) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE OPERATING FUND.
(E) THE OPERATING FUND SHALL BE USED TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO
QUALIFIED SUPPLIERS FOR OPERATIONAL COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH SUPPLYING
AGRICULTURAL FOOD PRODUCTS TO THE STATE’S FOOD BANKS AND CHARITABLE
EMERGENCY FOOD PROVIDERS.
(F) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
$1,000,000 TO THE OPERATING FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.